California statutes. Fish and Game Code
If the owner fails to sign and return the agreement granting the department the necessary rights for the installation of the screen or device within 60 days after its service on him, the department may install the screen as though the agreement had been signed unless a decision of the Department of Water Resources is requested. In the event the department and the owner of the conduit cannot agree upon the type, size, mesh, or location of the screen or device, the amount of water required for a bypass, or the time within which the screen or device shall be installed, the matter shall be submitted for determination to the Department of Water Resources, whose decision thereon shall be final and conclusive. The Department of Water Resources shall render its decision within 60 days after either the department or the owner has submitted the matter in writing and requested a decision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6025.

It is unlawful for the owner of a conduit to cause or permit a screen to be removed or taken out of place, except for repairs or cleaning, while water is running in the conduit, or to operate the conduit with the bypass closed when the screen is operating as provided in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6026.

Any screen installed under this article shall be such as will be reasonably adequate to prevent fish from passing into the conduit and will not unnecessarily impede the flow of water or prevent the owner from diverting the amount of water he is legally entitled to divert.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6027.

This article does not prevent the department from removing or permitting an owner to remove a screen or close a bypass during any part of the year when the department finds that such action will not endanger fish life.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6028.

All money paid by the department to the owner of a conduit pursuant to this article shall be paid out of the Fish and Game Preservation Fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Diversion of Water From Streams [6100. - 6100.]

6100.

(a) Notwithstanding any provision of Article 3 (commencing with Section 5980) and Article 4 (commencing with Section 6020), on or after January 1, 1972, any new diversion of water from any stream having populations of salmon and steelhead that is determined by the department to be deleterious to salmon and steelhead shall be screened by the owner.

(b) The construction, operation, or maintenance costs of any screen required pursuant to this article shall be borne by the owner of the diversion.

(c) If the department has determined that a diversion is deleterious to salmon and steelhead pursuant to subdivision (a), it shall provide written notice of its determination to the owner.

(d) The department shall notify the owner that the department shall make onsite investigation and shall make any other investigation before it shall propose any measures necessary to protect fishlife.

(e) Within 30 days of providing notice under this section, or within a time determined by mutual written agreement, the department shall submit to the owner its proposals as to measures necessary to protect the salmon and steelhead.

(f) The department, or any agency of the state, shall provide the owner of the diversion any available information that is required by the owner in order to comply with the provisions of this article.

(g) The diversion shall not commence until the department has determined that measures necessary to protect fishlife have been
 incorporated into the plans and construction of the diversion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 132, Sec. 119.   (AB 1760)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Infected or Diseased Fish [6300. - 6306.]

6300.

This chapter applies to all fish and amphibia, including, but not limited to, fish and amphibia being imported or transported. This chapter does not apply to activities governed by Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

6301.

The department may enter at any time any vehicle, container, warehouse, depot, ship, or growing area where any fish, amphibians, or aquatic plants are held, transported, or stored, for the purpose of making a regulatory inspection to ascertain whether those fish, amphibians, or aquatic plants are infected, diseased, or parasitized, or to determine if aquaculture products are being or have been legally imported, transported, or possessed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 285, Sec. 108.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

6302.

Except as otherwise provided in Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000), all fish, amphibia, or aquatic plants found to be infected, diseased, or parasitized are a public nuisance and shall be summarily destroyed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 13.)
-------------------------------------------

6303.

All fish, amphibia, or aquatic plants which the department determines are merely deleterious to fish, amphibia, aquatic plants, or aquatic animal life, shall be destroyed by the department, unless the owner or person in charge of the fish, amphibia, or aquatic plants ships them out of the State within a period of time to be specified by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1150.)
-------------------------------------------

6304.

If the department finds any infected, diseased, or parasitized fish, amphibia, or aquatic plants within this State, the department shall post notices describing, as nearly as possible, the boundaries of the area within which the fish, amphibia, or aquatic plants are found, and shall state the period during which the taking, carrying, and transportation of the fish, amphibia, or aquatic plants from the area shall be unlawful. The fact of posting the notices shall be published once a week for four successive weeks in some newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the infected area is situated, and, if there is no such newspaper in that county, then in a newspaper of general circulation published in an adjoining county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1150.)
-------------------------------------------

6305.

It is unlawful to carry or cause to be carried from one point in this State which has been posted according to the provisions of this article, to any other point in this State, any infected, diseased, or parasitized fish, amphibia, or aquatic plant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1150.)
-------------------------------------------

6306.

The expense of any examination made necessary by the provisions of this code, shall be borne by the owner of the fish, amphibia, or aquatic plants, or the person or persons importing them into this State; provided, that the department may assume such expense in the case of fish imported to provide fishing under the authority of a sport fishing license in the public waters of this State.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 1150.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Fish Planting and Propagation [6400. - 6598.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6400. - 6404.]

6400.

It is unlawful to place, plant, or cause to be placed or planted, in any of the waters of this State, any live fish, any fresh or salt water animal, or any aquatic plant, whether taken without or within the State, without first submitting it for inspection to, and securing the written permission of, the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1957, Ch. 456.)
-------------------------------------------

6400.5.

In addition to Section 6400, it is unlawful to transport or possess any live white bass (Marone chrysops), whether taken within or without the state, unless it is first submitted for inspection to, and written permission is obtained from, the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1686, Sec. 4.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

6401.

Any person may, under the terms of a permit first obtained from the department, under regulations the commission may prescribe, purchase or receive live fish from any registered aquaculturist, and may stock the fish in a stream or a lake.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

6402.

The department may plant fish in streams passing through, or in lakes on, land on which is located a youth camp for underprivileged children.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 424.)
-------------------------------------------

6403.

This chapter does not apply to activities governed by Division 12 (commencing with Section 15000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1486, Sec. 15.1.)
-------------------------------------------

6404.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature to make the Annual Provisional Stocking Document available to the public, recognizing that this document expresses the department’s intended plans for fish plants and that the department’s execution of these plans is not guaranteed.

(b) The department, before January 1 of each year, shall make an updated Annual Provisional Stocking Document publicly available on the department’s internet website.

(c) The department, as part of the document required pursuant to subdivision (b), shall include a disclaimer stating
 that these fish plants are not completely certain to occur as planned. The disclaimer shall include a statement that the department may not be able to adhere to the provisional stocking dates and places due to various unforeseen conditions, including, but not limited to, weather, disease, staffing, and funding. The disclaimer shall also include a statement referring the public to the Fish Planting Schedule on the department’s internet website for more up-to-date and accurate information about fish plants.

(d) As used in this section, the “Annual Provisional Stocking Document,” also known as the “Provisional Fish Release Plans for
 the Current Fiscal Year,” means a document used by the department that contains conditional or provisional plans for
 freshwater fish plants.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 181, Sec. 1.   (SB 579)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Artificial Reefs [6420. - 6425.]

6420.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Declines in various southern California marine species of fish have adversely affected the sport and commercial fishing industry.

(b) Efforts to enhance these species through the placement of artificial reefs need to be investigated.

(c) A program of artificial reef research and development, including reef design, placement, and monitoring, is in the public interest and can best be accomplished under the administration of the department with the cooperation and assistance of the University of California, the California State University, other established, appropriate academic institutions, and other organizations with demonstrated expertise in the field.

(d) A state artificial reef research and construction program under the administration of the department is necessary to coordinate ongoing studies and construction of artificial reefs in waters of the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 83, Sec. 55.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6421.

For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meaning:

(a) “Artificial reef” means manmade or natural objects intentionally placed in selected areas of the marine environment to duplicate those conditions that induce production of fish and invertebrates on natural reefs and rough bottoms, and that stimulate the growth of kelp or other midwater plant life which creates natural habitat for those species.

(b) “Production” means increases in the biomass of a species or number of species.

(c) “Program” means the California Artificial Reef Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1103, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6422.

The department shall administer the California Artificial Reef Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1103, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6423.

The program shall include all of the following:

(a) The placement of artificial reefs in state waters.

(b) A study of existing successful reefs and all new reefs placed by the program to determine the design criteria needed to construct artificial reefs capable of increasing fish and invertebrate production in waters of the state.

(c) A determination of the requirements for reef siting and placement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1103, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6424.

The amount allocated for the administration of the program in any fiscal year may not exceed the amount authorized by applicable state and federal policy guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1103, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

6425.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that not more than five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) shall be allocated to the program for the 1985–86 fiscal year.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that future sources of funding for the program may include, but are not limited to, the Fish and Game Preservation Fund, the California Environmental License Plate Fund, the Wildlife Restoration Fund, recreational bond act funds, federal grants-in-aid, county fish and game propagation funds, and private donations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1103, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Grass Carp [6440. - 6460.]

6440.

The Legislature finds and declares that triploid grass carp have the potential to control aquatic nuisance plants in non-public waters allowing for reduced chemical control but that the threat that grass carp pose to aquatic habitat may outweigh its benefits. It is the intent of this section to allow the department to use its management authority to provide for the long-term health of the ecosystem in the state, including the aquatic ecosystem, and, in that context, manage grass carp either through control of movement, eradication of populations, acquisition of habitat, and any other action that the department finds will maintain the biological diversity and the long term, overall health of the state’s environment. The department shall undertake the management of grass carp in a manner that is consistent with provisions of this code, and, for the
 purposes of this section, the department shall define management as handling, controlling, destroying, or moving species. The Legislature does not intend for this section to provide a right for the use of triploid grass carp if the department finds that use of the species poses an unacceptable risk to the state’s existing ecosystem.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 136.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

6450.

The department shall adopt regulations that provide for the control of aquatic plant pests using artificially introduced triploid grass carp under a permit issued by the department. The regulations shall do all of the following:

(a) Restrict triploid grass carp introductions to those triploid grass carp that have been rendered sterile immediately after the eggs have been fertilized.

(b) Require individual fish to be checked to ensure that a third, triploid, set of chromosomes has been retained, preventing further reproduction by that individual fish.

(c) Limit aquatic plant pest control programs using triploid grass carp to the use of sterile triploid grass carp with documented certification of triploidy to ensure sterility.

(d) Require the identification by tagging of individual fish as the property of each owner.

(e) Require the posting of notices at stocked bodies of water declaring the penalties for removing triploid grass carp.

(f) Limit the permits for the use of triploid grass carp in waters on golf courses located in residential areas to those waters that are determined by the department to be secure from the removal of triploid grass carp to unauthorized waters.

(g) Provide for management of the triploid grass carp populations in a manner consistent with the provisions of this code where the department finds that such actions will benefit the long-term health of the state’s biodiversity as a whole.

(h) Until January 1, 1999, the regulations shall not authorize the issuance of permits for the use of triploid grass carp in waters located within condominium areas of any residential area for which a permit may not be issued pursuant to subdivision (f) except at three locations within the area authorized pursuant to this subdivision. The three locations shall be selected by the department in consultation with the Imperial Irrigation District. The limitation to three locations is necessary to enable monitoring of human-induced movement of triploid grass carp to unauthorized waters and to permit the evaluation of the impact of the experiment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 745, Sec. 56.   Effective October 12, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6451.

All providers of triploid grass carp for use under this article shall provide certification acceptable to the department of triploidy and disease-free conditions for all fish introduced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6452.

Prior to receiving a permit from the department to use triploid grass carp, the potential user shall provide to the department all of the information required by the department, including, but not limited to, the following:

(a) The type of waterway to be stocked.

(b) The site has no connections to adjacent fresh water systems.

(c) All aquatic plant management problems, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The acres of aquatic plants, by species, at the peak of growing season.

(2) The desired vegetation quantity or coverage.

(3) The number and size of triploid grass carp recommended.

(4) All sensitive plant or animal species within the waterway to be stocked and any connected waterways.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6453.

(a) On or before March 1 of each year following the first year after triploid grass carp introduction, the permittee shall provide to the department all of the information required by the department, including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) The number and size of triploid grass carp recommended for the waterway stocked.

(2) The number and size of triploid grass carp stocked in the waterway.

(3) The acres of aquatic plants, by species, at the peak of the growing season in the year prior to introduction of triploid grass carp in the waterway stocked.

(4) The acres of aquatic plants, by species, at the peak of the current year growing season.

(b) The annual report shall be submitted until five years after the use of triploid grass carp to control aquatic plant pests is terminated, unless evidence acceptable to the department is provided that all triploid grass carp have been removed from the waterway.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 753, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6454.

The department shall establish permit and inspection fees sufficient to recover, but not exceed, the initial and ongoing costs of the program under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6455.

The department shall impose conditions in the permit to use triploid grass carp under this article that it finds necessary to prevent escape of the triploid grass carp from the targeted area. The conditions shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

(a) No permit shall be issued for the use of triploid grass carp in waters with an open fresh water connection to other waters of the state.

(b) Any waters in which triploid grass carp are used under this article shall be under the control of the permittee. In addition, barriers to fish movement acceptable to the department shall be in place before introduction of triploid grass carp under this article. Movement of triploid grass carp to areas outside the control of the permittee is prohibited.

(c) Any waters in which triploid grass carp are used under this article shall have sufficient dissolved oxygen and suitable vegetation for consumption to sustain the introduced triploid grass carp, as determined by the department.

(d) Except within closed basins, including the Salton Sea, no permit shall be issued for the use of triploid grass carp within the 100-year flood plain.

(e) Any person or persons engaging in the introduction of triploid grass carp into any area, or in the transfer of triploid grass carp from one site to another, without a permit from the department shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 753, Sec. 7.5.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

6456.

Nothing in this article shall be construed as restricting grass carp programs approved by the department on or before June 1, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6457.

Because of its experience and continuing involvement with hydrilla control programs, the implementation of Sections 6450 and 6454 shall be carried out in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 249, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

6460.

If the department obtains documented and verifiable evidence of escapements of triploid grass carp permitted under this article into unauthorized waters, the unauthorized use of grass carp, or threats to fish and wildlife and their habitats as the result of this program, it may, upon a written finding by the director to that effect, suspend the permit issuance process authorized by this article. If the situation is local, the suspension may be limited to that area whose waters, habitat, and fish and wildlife resources are threatened. The suspension shall last until the director makes a written finding that the threat has been abated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 533, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Ocean Fishery Research [6590. - 6598.]

6590.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Substantial declines in various species of desirable fish that are caught in southern California ocean waters have adversely affected sport and commercial fishing and their related industries.

(b) The purpose of this article is to determine if hatchery-released fish can enhance certain stocks of desirable species and contribute to research and scientific understanding of marine hatchery operations and benefits.

(c) Funding for the program is most appropriately borne by a special fund derived from
 user fees on sport and commercial fishermen who stand to directly benefit from the resurgence of depressed marine fisheries.

(d) The department has continuing resource management, administrative, and policy review responsibility in marine resources issues.

(e) Volunteers from the recreational fishing community have developed and operated grow-out facilities with private funding. These volunteer activities greatly enhance the effectiveness of the program and are fully compatible with the overall program objectives.

(f) As white sea bass hatchery production is established, additional grow-out facilities will be required and coordination between these facilities will be necessary. The ocean resources enhancement
 advisory panel may encourage contracts to carry out coordination activities and recommend to the director that this coordination remain a high priority. Those coordination activities
 may be funded with fees collected by the department pursuant to this article.

(g) The use of federal matching funds, including sportfish restoration account funds, shall be a high priority for use to match state dollars for this program.

(h) The department may benefit from contracting with other public or private entities to further the purposes of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 1.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6591.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Advisory panel” means the Ocean Resources Enhancement Advisory Panel established pursuant to Section 6594.

(b) “Committee” means the independent scientific advisory committee established pursuant to Section 6594.1.

(c) “Program” means the California Ocean Resources Enhancement and Hatchery Program established by this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 2.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6592.

There is hereby established in state government the California Ocean Resources Enhancement and Hatchery Program. The purpose of the program is to advance research on the artificial propagation, rearing, stocking, and distribution of marine fish species that are important to sport and commercial fishing in the ocean waters off the coast of California south of a line extending due west from Point Arguello, including research on the efficacy of artificial enhancement of stocks of these marine fish species through hatchery production.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 3.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6593.

(a) The program is administered by the director with the advice of the advisory panel and the committee.

(b) A person shall not serve on the advisory panel or the committee if that person is receiving research funding from the program.

(c) The director may appoint, with the advice of the advisory panel, a program manager to assist in administering the program.

(d) The director shall consider the advice of the advisory panel regarding program administration, including the expenditure of fee revenue and other sources of program
 funding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 4.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6594.

(a) To advise the director in establishing policy and direction for the program, the director shall establish the Ocean Resources Enhancement Advisory Panel.

(b) The advisory panel shall consist of the following members, all of whom shall be residents of California:

(1) One nonvoting member representing the department.

(2) One nonvoting member representing the California Sea Grant program.

(3) Two voting members representing the southern California
 commercial fishing industry.

(4) One voting member representing the southern California commercial passenger fishing vessel industry.

(5) Three voting members representing the southern California
 sport fishing industry.

(6) One voting member representing the southern California aquaculture industry.

(7) One voting member representing the public or nongovernmental organization interests, or both.

(c) There shall be a designated alternate member for each voting member of the advisory panel.

(d) The director shall appoint members and alternate members of the advisory panel after soliciting nominations for members and evaluating the experience, demonstrated program knowledge, and relevant stakeholder support of nominees.

(e) Each appointment of a member or alternate member shall be
 for a term of three years. There shall be no limit on the number of terms a member may serve on the advisory panel.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 5.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6594.1.

(a) In order to foster a transparent and collaborative approach between the public, the advisory panel, and the director, and to advise the director and the advisory panel regarding the program, the director shall establish an independent scientific advisory committee.

(b) The committee shall consist of members who collectively have expertise in the following areas:

(1) Fish genetics.

(2) Fish health.

(3) Marine aquaculture.

(4) Fish population biology or dynamics.

(5) Benthic or water quality.

(6) Stock enhancement or fish hatchery science.

(c) The committee may also include members who have expertise in other areas that the director determines to be relevant to the program.

(d) The committee shall provide advice to the director and the advisory panel in order to help ensure the scientific integrity and transparency in science-based decisionmaking of program activities. The committee shall provide recommendations on all of the following:

(1) Ensuring the documentation of the program’s scientific accomplishments,
 if needed.

(2) Prioritizing program research activities based upon an
 independent evaluation of program research needs and a consideration of the report described in subdivision (a) of Section 6594.5. In providing this recommendation, the committee shall consider at least all of the following:

(A) Systematic data collection in order to inform adaptive management of the program’s enhancement activities.

(B) The impacts of the program’s enhancement activities.

(C) The incorporation of best practices in hatchery science to, among other things, maintain the genetic diversity of stocked species.

(3) Identifying candidate focal species for enhancement or research potential.

(4) Developing quantitative criteria, benchmarks, and timelines to be used in evaluating the program and its activities.

(e) Each member of the committee shall receive one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of actual service performed in carrying out their official duties, but the amount of compensation for any one member shall not exceed the sum of five hundred dollars ($500) for any calendar year. In addition to this compensation, the members of the committee shall receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. The compensation and expenses provided in this subdivision shall be paid from funds made available to the program pursuant to Section 6595.

(f) The establishment of the committee pursuant to this section does not
 limit the director’s discretion to seek scientific and technical advice regarding the program from other sources.

(g) Department personnel shall provide support for the committee’s efforts, as applicable and needed.

(h) The director shall appoint members to the committee. The director shall determine the number of members to serve on the committee. Members of the committee shall serve at the pleasure of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 6.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6594.3.

The director shall convene an annual public meeting where the committee shall present information regarding its evaluation of aspects of program science it completed during the preceding year and an outlook for future program activities. At the meeting, the director shall provide information on the program’s compliance with any permitting requirements and the results of information solicited pursuant to Section 6596.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 7.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6594.5.

(a) The director shall consider the findings and results of the evaluation of the program conducted by California Sea Grant submitted to the department on December 12, 2017, in the report “Evaluation of the Ocean Resources Enhancement and Hatchery Program,” Publication no. CASG-17-010 in the operation of the program.

(b) (1) On or before July 1, 2027, the director shall submit a report to the relevant budget and policy committees of the Legislature and the Legislative Analyst’s Office regarding the status of the program and the program’s progress towards achieving its goals and objectives. The report shall include information
 regarding the findings of the committee, and incorporate, as applicable, information related to the program from the outcome of the service-based budget review conducted pursuant to Section 712.1.

(2) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on July 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 8.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6595.

(a) All fees collected by the department pursuant to this article, and any interest earned on those fees, shall be deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund and shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, solely for purposes of the program. The department shall maintain the internal accountability necessary to ensure that expenditures of these funds meet the requirements and restrictions of the purposes of the program.

(b) An amount, not to exceed 15 percent of the total annual revenues deposited in the Fish and Game Preservation Fund
 pursuant to this article, may be appropriated for the administration of the program, including any reasonable and necessary expenses incurred by members of the advisory panel in the discharge of their duties pursuant to this article and the compensation and expenses provided for the members of the committee pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 6594.1.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 9.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6596.1.

(a) In addition to a valid California sport fishing license and any other applicable license validation issued pursuant to this code, a person taking fish from ocean waters south of a line extending due west from Point Arguello for purposes other than for profit shall have a valid sport fishing ocean enhancement validation permanently affixed to his or her fishing license. A sport fishing ocean enhancement validation shall be issued upon payment of a base fee of three dollars and fifty cents ($3.50). A sport fishing license issued pursuant to paragraph (4) or (5) of subdivision (a) of Section 7149.05 is not subject to this subdivision.

(b) In addition to a valid California
 commercial passenger fishing boat license issued pursuant to Section 7920, the owner of any boat or vessel who, for profit, permits any person to fish therefrom, south of a line extending due west from Point Arguello, shall have a valid commercial fishing ocean enhancement validation issued for that vessel that has not been suspended or revoked.

(c) Any person who takes, possesses aboard a boat, or lands any white sea bass for commercial purposes south of a line extending due west from Point Arguello, shall have a valid commercial fishing ocean enhancement validation issued to that person that has not been suspended or revoked.

(d) The base fee for a commercial ocean fishing enhancement validation is thirty-five dollars ($35).

(e) This section applies only to licenses, permits, reservations, tags, and other
 entitlements issued through the Automated License Data System.

(f) The base fees specified in this section are applicable to the 2004 license year, and shall be adjusted annually thereafter pursuant to Section 713.

(g) The commission shall adjust the amount of the fees specified in subdivision (f), as necessary, to fully recover, but not exceed, all reasonable administrative and implementation costs of the department and the commission relating to those licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 565, Sec. 19.   (SB 1148)   Effective January 1, 2013.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6596.3.

The director shall provide for the solicitation of input from every person who pays a fee pursuant to Section 6596.1 on the direction of the program. The director may contract with a public or private entity to undertake this solicitation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 10.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6597.

(a) The department may contract with any public or private entity to conduct research projects pursuant to this article.

(b) The department may accept volunteer assistance for program operations, including, but not limited to, assistance with regard to grow-out facilities, provided that volunteers do not displace existing state employees.

(c) All research and research results conducted through the program shall be publicly available.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 11.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6597.5.

It is in the interest of the state to have broad participation in enhancement programs. Therefore, this program shall be open to participation by qualified academic institutions, as determined by the department, and nonprofit organizations, commercial aquaculturists, and for profit enterprises.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 987, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 6598.)
-------------------------------------------

6598.

This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 345, Sec. 13.   (AB 1949)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Art. 8, commencing with Sec. 6590.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. California Marine Resources Legacy Act [6600. - 6621.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [6600. - 6605.]

6600.

This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Marine Resources Legacy Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 687, Sec. 1.   (AB 2503)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

6601.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) California’s extraordinary marine biological diversity is a vital asset to the state and nation. The diversity of species and ecosystems found in the ocean waters off the state is important to public health and well-being, ecological health, and ocean-dependent economic activities.
